District of Columbia statutes.
29-809.03

Action on plan of merger by constituent company.

(a)

A plan of merger shall be consented to by all the members of a constituent company.

(b)

Subject to any contractual rights, after a merger is approved, and at any time before articles of merger are delivered to the Mayor for filing under § 29-809.04, a constituent company may amend the plan or abandon the merger:

(1)

As provided in the plan; or

(2)

Except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-809.02.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1003 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).